Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE A. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 5. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES IN GENERAL

SUBCHAPTER A. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

Sec. 5.001. TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. A municipality is a Type A general-law municipality if it:

(1) has incorporated as a Type A general-law municipality under Subchapter A of Chapter 6 and has not acted to change to another type of municipality;

(2) has changed to a Type A general-law municipality under Subchapter B of Chapter 6 and has not acted to change to another type of municipality; or

(3) operated, immediately preceding September 1, 1987, under Chapters 1-10, Title 28, Revised Statutes, and has not acted to change to another type of municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.002. TYPE B GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. A municipality is a Type B general-law municipality if it:

(1) has incorporated as a Type B general-law municipality under Chapter 7 and has not acted to change to another type of municipality; or

(2) operated, immediately preceding September 1, 1987, under Chapter 11, Title 28, Revised Statutes, and has not acted to change to another type of municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.003. TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. A municipality is a Type C general-law municipality if it:

(1) has incorporated as a Type C general-law municipality under Subchapter A of Chapter 8 and has not acted to change to another type of municipality;

(2) has changed to a Type C general-law municipality under Subchapter B of Chapter 8 and has not acted to change to another type of municipality; or

(3) operated, immediately preceding September 1, 1987, under Chapter 12, Title 28, Revised Statutes, and has not acted to change to another type of municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.004. HOME-RULE MUNICIPALITY. A municipality is a home-rule municipality if it operates under a municipal charter that has been adopted or amended as authorized by Article XI, Section 5, of the Texas Constitution.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.005. SPECIAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) A municipality is a special-law municipality if it operates under a municipal charter granted by a local law enacted by the Congress of the Republic of Texas or by the legislature.

(b) A special-law municipality that has amended its municipal charter as authorized by Article XI, Section 5, of the Texas Constitution is also a home-rule municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS AFFECTING TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

Sec. 5.901. TERRITORIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR INCORPORATION AS GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. A community may not incorporate as a general-law municipality unless it meets the following territorial requirements:

(1) a community with fewer than 2,000 inhabitants must have not more than two square miles of surface area;

(2) a community with 2,001 to 4,999 inhabitants must have not more than four square miles of surface area; and

(3) a community with 5,001 to 9,999 inhabitants must have not more than nine square miles of surface area.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.902. CHANGE IN DESIGNATION FROM TOWN TO CITY. (a) The governing body of a Type A general-law municipality that was designated as a "town" may change by ordinance its designation to a "city."

(b) A change in designation does not affect the municipality's corporate existence or powers.

(c) Bonds that are voted by a municipality and are unissued before the municipality changes its designation may be issued in the new name of the municipality as designated in the ordinance changing the designation.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.903. CHARTER AMENDMENTS BY SPECIAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY INCORPORATED BEFORE JUNE 30, 1881. (a) A special-law municipality that was incorporated as a town or village before June 30, 1881, by the Congress of the Republic of Texas or by the legislature may amend its charter in any regard that does not conflict with the law of this state if the amendment is approved by a resolution of the governing body of the town or village and by at least a two-thirds vote at an election held to ratify the amendment.

(b) An amendment to a charter under Subsection (a) is not effective until:

(1) the governing body of the town or village adopts a resolution stating the amendment; and

(2) a certified copy of the amendment is approved by the attorney general and recorded with the secretary of state.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 5.904. MUNICIPALITY NOT GOVERNED BY CORPORATE LAW. (a) A municipality may not be considered a corporation under a state statute governing corporations unless the statute extends its application to a municipality by express use of the term "municipal corporation," "municipality," "city," "town," or "village."

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the limitation provided by this section apply regardless of whether the municipality is acting in a governmental or proprietary function.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 2(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.